District of Columbia statutes.
42-3531.02

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish the Office of the Tenant Advocate as an independent agency to advocate on behalf of the education of, and outreach to, tenants and the people of the District.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2062, 52 DCR 7503
Oct. 1, 2007, D.C. Law 16-181, § 2(b), 53 DCR 6703

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-181 substituted “as an independent agency” for “as an office within the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2062 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Effective Dates

Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “Section 2 through 4 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”